Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.210

Authority of governor.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all acts of congress enacted in pursuance thereof, the governor of this state may in his or her discretion have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1066; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 2.]